Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.206] YOUTH PROTECTION FROM HARMFUL THERAPEUTIC PRACTICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Conversion therapy" has the meaning given in section 214.078, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (c) "Mental health professional" means a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, social worker, counselor, or any other person licensed in this state to provide professional mental health care or counseling. new text end new text begin (d) "Minor" means an individual under 18 years of age. new text end new text begin (e) "Parent or guardian" means a parent or legal guardian of a minor. new text end new text begin (f) "Psychological harm" includes but is not limited to depression, anxiety, self-harm, suicidal ideation or attempts, posttraumatic stress disorder, and loss of self-esteem. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Cause of action; conversion therapy. new text end new text begin (a) An individual who was injured by conversion therapy prior to reaching the age of 18 has a cause of action for relief against a mental health professional who administered the conversion therapy. A mental health professional who engages in conversion therapy on an individual who has not reached the age of 18 is liable for damages as provided in this section. An injury under this section includes psychological harm caused by conversion therapy. new text end new text begin (b) An action under this section may be brought by the parent or guardian of a minor who was injured by conversion therapy: new text end new text begin (1) on the minor's behalf prior to reaching the age of 18; or new text end new text begin (2) when the individual subject to conversion therapy is deceased or incapacitated. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Relief. new text end new text begin (a) A court may award a plaintiff who prevails in an action brought under this section the following relief: new text end new text begin (1) injunctive relief to prevent the defendant from engaging in future conversion therapy in violation of the standard of care; new text end new text begin (2) a civil penalty in an amount of not less than $50,000 to the injured individual, or their parent or guardian when applicable; new text end new text begin (3) general, special, and punitive damages; and new text end new text begin (4) a plaintiff's costs and reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (b) This section does not allow an officer or employee of the state or any political subdivision to bring or participate in an action to enforce this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Venue. new text end new text begin A plaintiff may bring an action under this section in the county where the plaintiff resides at the time the action is brought or the county where the defendant resides at the time the action is brought. new text end